Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,113
Sections, how construed.

Sections 25-12,112 to 25-12,114 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose of making uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1951, c. 56, § 2, p. 189.